North Carolina, session 2025, SB663.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services the sum of three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated to the Diaper Bank of North
Carolina, a nonprofit organization that collects and distributes diapers and other personal hygiene
products to assist those in need and to increase the accessibility of feminine hygiene products in
local diaper banks throughout the State.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) in recurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year to fund the Feminine Hygiene Products Grant Program under
G.S. 115C-377.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S663-v-1*